Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2011
77-6304
Pass-through entity; certification
as qualified fund; application; form; director; duties; qualification; eligibility
for tax credits.

(1)
A pass-through entity may apply to the director for certification as a qualified
fund for a calendar year. The application shall be in the form and be made
under the procedures specified by the director.

(2) Within
thirty days after receiving an application for certification under this section,
the director shall certify the pass-through entity as satisfying the conditions
required of a qualified fund, request additional information, or deny the
application. If the director requests additional information, the director
shall certify the pass-through entity or deny the application within thirty
days after receiving the additional information. If the director neither certifies
the pass-through entity nor denies the application within thirty days after
receiving the original application or within thirty days after receiving the
additional information requested, whichever is later, then the application
is deemed approved if the pass-through entity meets the qualifications in
subsection (3) of this section. A pass-through entity that applies for certification
and is denied may reapply.

(3) To be certified, a pass-through entity
shall:

(a) Invest or intend to invest in qualified small businesses; and

(b) Have at
least three separate investors and all the investors satisfy the conditions
in subsection (3) of section 77-6305.

(4) A qualified fund may consist of equity
investments or notes that pay interest or other fixed amounts, or any combination
of both.

(5) In order for a qualified investment in a qualified small business
to be eligible for tax credits, a qualified fund that makes the qualified
investment shall have applied for and received certification for the calendar
year in which the qualified investment was made prior to making the qualified
investment.

Laws 2011, LB389, § 4.
September 1, 2011